Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20147-209
Legal Education
for Public Service and Rural
Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund;
created; investment.

The Legal Education for Public
Service and Rural Practice Loan
Repayment Assistance Fund
is created. The fund shall consist of funds appropriated
or transferred by the Legislature, funds donated to the legal
education for public legal service and rural practice loan repayment assistance program pursuant
to section 7-208, and
application fees collected under the Legal Education for Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Act. Any money in the Legal Education for Public
Service Loan Repayment Fund on July 18, 2014, shall be transferred to the
Legal Education for Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance
Fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 27;

Laws 2014, LB907, § 9.
July 18, 2014
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.